Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1141YC (4) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 208.6 Maps. 1 Upon request by the division, the state geologist shall 2 furnish the division with the latest filed maps and extensions 3 of active mine sites pursuant to section 456.11 . 4 Sec. 2. Section 208.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 1. The division may , for repeated or willful for a violation 7 of any of the provisions of this chapter , including the 8 violation of a rule adopted or an order issued pursuant to this 9 chapter , initiate an action to suspend, revoke, or refuse to 10 issue a mining license. 11 Sec. 3. Section 208.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. An operator of an active underground 14 mine site shall immediately notify the division of the 15 formation of a sinkhole located at or above the underground 16 mine site. 17 Sec. 4. Section 208.10A, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 18 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 Any A person who violates an order issued pursuant to section 20 208.10 or 208.17A shall be subject to an administrative penalty 21 determined by the division not to exceed five thousand dollars 22 per violation. 23 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 208.17A Active underground mines. 24 1. The division may adopt rules providing for the 25 reclamation of lands disturbed due to the formation of a 26 sinkhole at or above an active underground mine site required 27 to be registered pursuant to section 208.9 . The administrator 28 may issue an emergency remediation order to the operator of 29 the mine requiring immediate restoration. The division shall 30 deliver a copy of the emergency reclamation order to the 31 operator by personal service. 32 2. The division may require the operator to submit to the 33 division for approval a remediation plan or statement affirming 34 that the remediation has been completed in compliance with 35 -1- LSB 1141YC (4) 91 da/ns 1/ 4 H.F. _____ division requirements. 1 Sec. 6. Section 208.19, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. This section does not apply to the 4 reclamation of an active underground mine site as provided in 5 section 208.17A. 6 Sec. 7. Section 208.20, Code 2025, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 208.20 Extension of time. 9 The time for completion of reclamation work may be extended 10 upon presentation by the operator of evidence satisfactory 11 to the division that the reclamation of affected land cannot 12 be completed within the time specified by section 208.17A or 13 208.19. 14 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 208.24A Use of single or multiple 15 bonds. 16 Regardless of whether an operator posts a number of multiple 17 bonds each for a single mine site or a single bond for multiple 18 mine sites, the total amount of the multiple bonds combined 19 or the single bond shall be applied to cover the costs of 20 completing the reclamation of lands at any one mine site 21 required to be registered pursuant to section 208.9 . 22 Sec. 9. Section 456.11, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 9. Abandoned mine Mines . 25 a. When any an underground mine is worked out or is about to 26 be abandoned or indefinitely closed, the operator of the same 27 shall make or cause to be made a completed and extended map 28 of the mine and the result of the same shall be duly extended 29 on all maps of the mine and copies thereof so as to show all 30 excavations and the most advanced workings of the mine, and 31 their exact relation to the boundary or section lines on the 32 surface, and deliver to the state geologist a copy of the 33 completed map. 34 b. When an underground mining site is active, its operator 35 -2- LSB 1141YC (4) 91 da/ns 2/ 4 H.F. _____ shall provide a current map and current map extensions of 1 the active underground mining site to the state geologist as 2 required by the state geologist. The state geologist shall 3 deliver a copy of the current map and current map extensions 4 to the division of soil conservation and water quality of the 5 department of agriculture and land stewardship as provided in 6 section 208.6 . 7 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 8 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 9